Utah statutes.
72-2-203.   Loans and assistance -- Authority -- Rulemaking.

(1)  Money in the fund may be used by the department, as prioritized by the commission, to make infrastructure loans or to provide infrastructure assistance to any public entity for any purpose consistent with any applicable constitutional limitation.

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission shall make rules providing procedures and standards for making infrastructure loans and providing infrastructure assistance.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

